en: Wheat flour type 400, Wheat flour T400
cs: mouky pšeničné polohrubé

en: Wheat flour type 450, Wheat flour T450
cs: mouky pšeničné hrubé

en: Whole wheat flours, Atta
bg: Пълнозърнесто пшенично брашно
de: Vollkornweizenmehle
es: Harina de trigo integral
fi: Täysjyvävehnäjauhot
hr: Integralna pšenična brašna
ja: 全粒粉
nl: Volkoren graanmeel

en: White wheat flours, Maida, Refined wheat flour
nl: Witte tarwebloem

en: Whole common wheat flours
es: Harinas de trigo común integrales
fr: Farines de froment T150, Farine de froment T150
hr: Cjelovito pšenično brašno
nl: Gewone volkoren tarwemelen

en: Wheat flour type 150
de: Weizenmehle Type 1600
es: Harinas de trigo integrales
fr: Farines de blé type T150, Farines de blé T150, Farines de blé type 150, farines intégrales de blé, Farine de blé tendre T150
hr: Pšenično brašno tip 150

en: Durum wheat flours, Macaroni wheat flours
es: Harinas de trigo duro
fr: Farines de blé dur
hr: Brašna durum pšenice
it: Farine di grano duro
nl: Durum tarwemelen

en: Einkorn wheat flours
bg: Брашно от лимец
es: Harinas de trigo escaña cultivada, Harinas de escaña
fr: Farines de petit épeautre, Farines d'engrain
hr: Pšenično brašno od jednozrna
nl: Eenkoornmelen

en: Small spelt flour T45
fr: Farines de petit épeautre T45

en: White einkorn wheat flours
es: Harinas de trigo escaña cultivada blancas

en: Small spelt flour T65
fr: Farines de petit épeautre T65

en: Small spelt flour T70
fr: Farines de petit épeautre T70
hr: Sitno speltino brašno t70
nl: Eenkoornmelen T70

en: Semi-polished einkorn wheat flours
es: Harinas de trigo escaña cultivada semi-integrales
fr: Farines de petit épeautre T80
hr: Polupolirana pšenična brašna od jednozrna

en: Wheat flour T110, Wheat flour type 110
de: Weizenmehle Type 1050
fr: Farines de blé type T110, Farines de blé T110, Farines de blé type 110, farines complètes de blé, Farine de blé tendre T110
hr: Pšenično brašno t110
nl: Volkoren tarwemelen

en: Manitoba flours
fr: Farines de Manitoba, farine Manitoba

en: Small spelt flour T110
fr: Farines de petit épeautre T110
hr: Sitno speltino brašno t110
nl: Klein volkoren speltmeel T110

en: Whole einkorn wheat flours
es: Harinas de trigo escaña cultivada integrales
fr: Farines de petit épeautre T150
hr: Pšenično brašno od cjelovitog jednozrna
nl: Volkoren eenkornmelen

en: Emmer wheat flours
es: Harinas de escandas, Harinas de povia
fr: Farines d'amidonnier
hr: Emmer pšenično brašno
it: Farine di farro dicocco
nl: Emmertarwemelen

en: Khorasan wheat flours, Kamut flours
es: Harinas de trigo de Jorasán, Harinas de Kamut
fr: Farines de blé khorasan, Farines de Kamut, Farines de Blé de Khorasan, Farines de Khorasan
hr: Khorasan pšenično brašno
nl: Kamutmelen

en: White Khorasan wheat flours, White Kamut flours
es: Harinas de trigo de Jorasán blancas, Harinas de Kamut blancas